Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1027
Power supply plan; research and conservation report; board; include data in biennial report; hearing.

The board shall, in its biennial report, include data from any coordinated long-range power supply plan or research and conservation report filed with it. Before publishing its biennial report, if a coordinated long-range power plan or a research and conservation report has been filed with the board in the previous reporting period, the board shall consider, at a public hearing after giving notice of such hearing, the coordinated long-range power supply plan or the research and conservation report.

Laws 1981, LB 302, § 5;

Laws 1986, LB 948, § 3.